Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB420.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of October 5, 1978 (P.L.1109, No.261), known as the Osteopathic Medical Practice Act, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 13.4. Disclosure of complaints filed against physicians.A physician shall not be required to disclose a complaint filed against the physician with the board to any person or entity if all of the following apply:(1) The board determines that no disciplinary or corrective action against the physician is necessary.(2) The complaint file is closed without any 12345678910111213141516171819 disciplinary or corrective action against the physician.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0420PN0354 - 2 - 12